Utah statutes.
31A-19a-301.   Operation and control of rate service organizations.

(1) (a) A rate service organization may not provide any service relating to statistical collection or the rates of any insurance subject to this chapter unless the organization is licensed under Section 31A-19a-302.

(b)  An insurer may not use the services of the organization for the purposes described in Subsection (1)(a), unless the organization is licensed under Section 31A-19a-302.

(2) A rate service organization may not refuse to supply any services for which it is licensed in this state to any insurer:

(a)  authorized to do business in this state; and

(b)  that offers to pay the fair and usual compensation for the services.

